Utah, session 2026, HB128.
Section 1. Section 41-6a-804 is amended to read:41-6a-804. Turning or changing lanes -- Safety -- Signals -- Stopping or sudden decrease in speed -- Signal flashing -- Where prohibited.(1)(a)A person An individual may not turn a vehicle, merge into a continuing lane from a lane of travel that is ending, or otherwise move right or left on a roadway or change lanes until:(i)(a)the movement can be made with reasonable safety; and(ii)(b)an appropriate signal has been given as provided under this section.(b)(c)An individual shall give aA signal of intention to turn right or left or to change lanes shall be given  continuously for at least the last two seconds preceding before the beginning of the movement.(2)A person An individual may not stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal to the operator of any  a vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give a signal.(3)(a)AAn individual shall give a stop or turn signal when required shall be given , either by the hand and arm or by signal lamps.(b)If hand and arm signals are used, a personIf an individual operating a vehicle uses hand and arm signals, the individual shall give the required hand and arm signals from the left side of the vehicle as follows:(i)left turn: hand and arm extended horizontally;(ii)right turn: hand and arm extended upward; and(iii)stop or decrease speed: hand and arm extended downward.(c)(i)A person An individual operating a bicycle or device propelled by human power may give the required hand and arm signals for a right turn by extending the right hand and arm horizontally to the right.(ii)This Subsection (3)(c) is an exception to the provision of Subsection (3)(b)(ii).(4)A person An individual required to make a  signal under this section may not flash a signal:(a)on one side only on a disabled vehicle;(b)as a courtesy or "do pass" to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear; or(c)on one side only of a parked vehicle.(5)Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, an individual is not required to make a signal of intention to turn when entering or exiting a roundabout.(5)(6)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.